Utah statutes.
25-6-10.   Claim for relief -- Time limits.

A claim for relief or cause of action regarding a fraudulent transfer or obligation under this chapter is extinguished unless action is brought:

(1)  under Subsection 25-6-5(1)(a), within four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, within one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

(2)  under Subsection 25-6-5(1)(b) or 25-6-6(1), within four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

(3)  under Subsection 25-6-6(2), within one year after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred.

